Nebraska, session 109, LB316.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB316 LB316
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 2-501, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
2-501 Sections 2-501 to 2-518 and section 3 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Nebraska Hemp Farming Act.
Sec. 2. Section 2-503, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
2-503 For purposes of the Nebraska Hemp Farming Act:
(1) Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018 means section 10113 of the
federal Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018, Public Law 115-334, and any
regulations adopted and promulgated under such section, as such section,
act, and regulations existed on January 1, 2024;
(2) Cannabidiol product means a finished hemp consumer product that:
(a) Contains, as a primary ingredient, cannabidiol extracted or
derived from hemp;
(b) Complies with the THC limits provided in subdivision (5)(a)(ii)
of this section; and
(c) Does not contain any cannabinoids created through chemical
conversion, modification, or synthesis, including, but not limited to,
hexahydrocannabinol;
(3) (2) Cultivate or cultivating means planting, watering, growing,
and harvesting a hemp plant or crop. The presence of plants of the plant
Cannabis sativa L. growing as uncultivated, naturalized plants in the
environment is not cultivating hemp for purposes of the Nebraska Hemp
Farming Act;
(4) Federally compliant hemp means hemp that complies with the
requirements of the Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018;
(5)(a) (3) Hemp means the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of
such plant, including the viable seeds of such plant and all derivatives,
extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers,
whether growing or not, that complies with the following THC limits:
(i) For raw hemp, a total THC with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol
-2-

LB316 LB316
2025 2025
concentration of not more than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis; and .
(ii) For processed hemp, including cannabidiol products, not more
than the lesser of:
(A) A total THC concentration of 0.3 percent on a total weight
basis; or
(B) Ten milligrams of total THC per package.
(b) Hemp includes cannabidiol products.
(c) Hemp does not include the mature stalks of the plant Cannabis
sativa L.; fiber produced from such stalks; oil or cake made from the
seeds of such plant; any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative,
mixture, or preparation of such mature stalks; or the sterilized seed of
such plant that is incapable of germination Hemp shall be considered an
agricultural commodity. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, hemp
shall not be considered a controlled substance under the Uniform
Controlled Substances Act;
(6) (4) Person means an individual, partnership, corporation,
limited liability company, association, postsecondary institution, or
other legal entity;
(7) Raw hemp means hemp that has been harvested and dried but is
otherwise unprocessed;
(8) (5) State-program-licensed hemp producer means a person licensed
under a USDA-approved state or tribal program as authorized under the
Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018 and includes the authorized employees
or agents of such person;
(9) THC means tetrahydrocannabinol;
(10) THC concentration refers to the concentration of THC as
measured through procedures that use post-decarboxylation or other
similarly reliable measures to account for any chemical precursors to
cannabinoids, including tetrahydrocannabinolic acid. Such chemical
precursors, including tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, shall be included in
the total THC concentration measurement;
-3-

LB316 LB316
2025 2025
(11) (6) USDA means the United States Department of Agriculture; and
(12) (7) USDA-licensed hemp producer means a person licensed by the
USDA to produce hemp as provided in 7 C.F.R. part 990, subpart C, as such
regulations existed on January 1, 2024, and includes the authorized
employees or agents of such person.
Sec. 3. (1) Beginning January 1, 2026, an excise tax shall be
levied on the retail sale of cannabidiol products to consumers. The tax
shall be at a rate of ten percent of the retail purchase price.
(2) The excise tax imposed by this section shall be in addition to
all other occupation or privilege taxes imposed by this state or by any
political subdivision of the state.
(3) Each retail seller of cannabidiol products shall maintain
complete and accurate electronic records of sales of cannabidiol
products, in the manner prescribed by the Department of Revenue. Such
seller shall provide such records to the department upon request.
(4)(a) Each retail seller of cannabidiol products shall file a
return with the department by the twentieth day of the month following
the month reported and with the report shall remit the amount of excise
tax due.
(b) The return, which shall be upon forms prescribed and furnished
by the department, shall contain, among other things, the total amount of
cannabidiol products sold or transferred during the preceding month and
the amount of tax due thereon.
(c) The department may require retail sellers to file tax returns
electronically and to remit payments due by electronic funds transfers.
(5) The department shall collect the excise tax and shall account
for and remit to the State Treasurer at least once each month all money
collected pursuant to such tax for credit to the Property Tax Credit Cash
Fund.
Sec. 4. Section 2-505, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
-4-

LB316 LB316
2025 2025
2-505 (1)(a) This subsection applies to hemp other than cannabidiol
products.
(b) Hemp shall not be cultivated, possessed, handled, transported,
processed, used, sold, or consumed in this state, except as provided in
this subsection.
(c) Federally compliant hemp (1) Hemp may be cultivated in this
state by a USDA-licensed hemp producer, in accordance with such
producer's USDA-issued license, or by a state-program-licensed hemp
producer, in accordance with such producer's license under a USDA-
approved tribal program.
(d) (2) Hemp may only be transported pursuant to section 2-515.
(2) Any cannabidiol product shall be possessed, handled,
transported, used, sold, and consumed in accordance with:
(a) The Nebraska Pure Food Act; and
(b) The Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. 301 et seq.,
and any regulations adopted and promulgated under such act, as such act
and regulations existed on January 1, 2025.
(3)(a) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Consumer safe harbor period means the period of time beginning
on the effective date of this act and ending on December 31, 2025; and
(ii) Illegal hemp means hemp, hemp products, or cannabidiol products
that do not comply with the THC limits provided in subdivision (5)(a) of
section 2-503 or, except as provided in subdivision (3)(d) of this
section, that are otherwise not lawful under the Nebraska Hemp Farming
Act.
(b) An individual consumer shall not be subject to prosecution for
possession of illegal hemp during the consumer safe harbor period.
(c) The Attorney General may coordinate with law enforcement
agencies to establish appropriate locations where, during the consumer
safe harbor period, consumers may drop off illegal hemp for destruction
without prosecution for transporting or handling such illegal hemp for
-5-

LB316 LB316
2025 2025
destruction.
(d) This subsection does not prevent prosecution for the
cultivation, possession, handling, transportation, processing, use, sale,
or other distribution of raw materials or products with a delta-9 THC
concentration of more than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis.
Sec. 5. Section 2-515, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
2-515 (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, any
USDA-licensed hemp producer or state-program-licensed hemp producer
transporting hemp shall carry with the hemp being transported a copy of
the USDA license or state program license under which it was cultivated
and a copy of the test results pertaining to each lot of hemp being
transported.
(2) A USDA-licensed hemp producer or state-program-licensed hemp
producer under a USDA-approved tribal program cultivating hemp in this
state shall maintain a record of shipments of hemp shipped from or
received by such producer. Such record shall, for each shipment of hemp,
indicate the date of shipment, identify the point of origin and
destination, identify the name of the person sending and receiving the
shipment, and include the vehicle identification number of the vehicle
transporting the hemp.
(3) Any USDA-licensed hemp producer or state-program-licensed hemp
producer transporting hemp cultivated under such producer's USDA license
or state program license shall not be required to carry a copy of the
test results relating to such hemp as provided in subsection (1) of this
section if such producer carries with the hemp being transported a copy
of the applicable USDA license or state program license and is
transporting:
(a) Hemp between two registered sites listed on the producer's USDA
or state program license application;
(b) Samples of hemp for testing to determine the
-6-

LB316 LB316
2025 2025
tetrahydrocannabinol level; or
(c) Live hemp plants to a registered site listed on the producer's
USDA or state program license application prior to cultivating such hemp
plants.
(4) Federally compliant hemp may be transported in interstate
commerce for any lawful purpose (4) Any person who is carrying or
transporting hemp who is not a USDA-licensed hemp producer or state-
program-licensed hemp producer shall only carry or transport hemp if such
hemp meets the following requirements:
(a) The hemp is carried or transported with a bill of lading stating
the owner of the hemp, the point of origin of the hemp, and the
destination of the hemp; and
(b) The hemp is carried or transported with a copy of the valid USDA
or state program license under which the hemp was cultivated;
(c) The hemp is carried or transported with a copy of the test
results pertaining to each lot of hemp being transported; and
(b) (d) The hemp is not unloaded or in any way removed from the
vehicle transporting such hemp unless authorized by state or federal law
enforcement.
(5) No person shall transport or carry hemp in this state
concurrently with any other plant material that is not hemp.
Sec. 6. Section 28-401, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-401 As used in the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Administer means to directly apply a controlled substance by
injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means to the body of a
patient or research subject;
(2) Agent means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the
direction of another person but does not include a common or contract
carrier, public warehouse keeper, or employee of a carrier or warehouse
-7-

LB316 LB316
2025 2025
keeper;
(3) Administration means the Drug Enforcement Administration of the
United States Department of Justice;
(4) Controlled substance means a drug, biological, substance, or
immediate precursor in Schedules I through V of section 28-405.
Controlled substance does not include distilled spirits, wine, malt
beverages, tobacco, hemp, or any nonnarcotic substance if such substance
may, under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. 301 et
seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2014, and the law of this state,
be lawfully sold over the counter without a prescription;
(5) Counterfeit substance means a controlled substance which, or the
container or labeling of which, without authorization, bears the
trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, number, or
device, or any likeness thereof, of a manufacturer, distributor, or
dispenser other than the person or persons who in fact manufactured,
distributed, or dispensed such substance and which thereby falsely
purports or is represented to be the product of, or to have been
distributed by, such other manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser;
(6) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(7) Division of Drug Control means the personnel of the Nebraska
State Patrol who are assigned to enforce the Uniform Controlled
Substances Act;
(8) Dispense means to deliver a controlled substance to an ultimate
user or a research subject pursuant to a medical order issued by a
practitioner authorized to prescribe, including the packaging, labeling,
or compounding necessary to prepare the controlled substance for such
delivery;
(9) Distribute means to deliver other than by administering or
dispensing a controlled substance;
(10) Prescribe means to issue a medical order;
(11) Drug means (a) articles recognized in the official United
-8-

LB316 LB316
2025 2025
States Pharmacopoeia, official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United
States, official National Formulary, or any supplement to any of them,
(b) substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease in human beings or animals, and (c)
substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in
subdivision (a) or (b) of this subdivision, but does not include devices
or their components, parts, or accessories;
(12) Deliver or delivery means the actual, constructive, or
attempted transfer from one person to another of a controlled substance,
whether or not there is an agency relationship;
(13) Hemp has the same meaning as in section 2-503;
(14)(a) Marijuana means all parts of the plant of the genus
cannabis, whether growing or not, the seeds thereof, and every compound,
manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant or
its seeds.
(b) Marijuana does not include:
(i) The the mature stalks of such plant; ,
(ii) Hashish;
(iii) Tetrahydrocannabinols hashish, tetrahydrocannabinols extracted
or isolated from the plant; ,
(iv) Fiber fiber produced from such stalks; ,
(v) Oil oil or cake made from the seeds of such plant; ,
(vi) Any any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture,
or preparation of such mature stalks; ,
(vii) The the sterilized seed of such plant which is incapable of
germination; or , or
(viii) Cannabidiol cannabidiol contained in a drug product approved
by the federal Food and Drug Administration.
(c) Marijuana includes does not include hemp, except for hemp
possessed in compliance with the Nebraska Hemp Farming Act.
(d) When the weight of marijuana is referred to in the Uniform
-9-

LB316 LB316
2025 2025
Controlled Substances Act, it means its weight at or about the time it is
seized or otherwise comes into the possession of law enforcement
authorities, whether cured or uncured at that time;
(15) Manufacture means the production, preparation, propagation,
conversion, or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or
indirectly, by extraction from substances of natural origin,
independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of
extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or
repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container.
Manufacture does not include the preparation or compounding of a
controlled substance by an individual for his or her own use, except for
the preparation or compounding of components or ingredients used for or
intended to be used for the manufacture of methamphetamine, or the
preparation, compounding, conversion, packaging, or labeling of a
controlled substance: (a) By a practitioner as an incident to his or her
prescribing, administering, or dispensing of a controlled substance in
the course of his or her professional practice; or (b) by a practitioner,
or by his or her authorized agent under his or her supervision, for the
purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical
analysis and not for sale;
(16) Narcotic drug means any of the following, whether produced
directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin,
independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of
extraction and chemical synthesis: (a) Opium, opium poppy and poppy
straw, coca leaves, and opiates; (b) a compound, manufacture, salt,
derivative, or preparation of opium, coca leaves, or opiates; or (c) a
substance and any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, or preparation
thereof which is chemically equivalent to or identical with any of the
substances referred to in subdivisions (a) and (b) of this subdivision,
except that the words narcotic drug as used in the Uniform Controlled
Substances Act does not include decocainized coca leaves or extracts of
-10-

LB316 LB316
2025 2025
coca leaves, which extracts do not contain cocaine or ecgonine, or
isoquinoline alkaloids of opium;
(17) Opiate means any substance having an addiction-forming or
addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of
conversion into a drug having such addiction-forming or addiction-
sustaining liability. Opiate does not include the dextrorotatory isomer
of 3-methoxy-n methylmorphinan and its salts. Opiate includes its racemic
and levorotatory forms;
(18) Opium poppy means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum
L., except the seeds thereof;
(19) Poppy straw means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium
poppy after mowing;
(20) Person means any corporation, association, partnership, limited
liability company, or one or more persons;
(21) Practitioner means a physician, a physician assistant, a
dentist, a veterinarian, a pharmacist, a podiatrist, an optometrist, a
certified nurse midwife, a certified registered nurse anesthetist, a
nurse practitioner, a scientific investigator, a pharmacy, a hospital, or
any other person licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to
distribute, dispense, prescribe, conduct research with respect to, or
administer a controlled substance in the course of practice or research
in this state, including an emergency medical service as defined in
section 38-1207;
(22) Production includes the manufacture, planting, cultivation, or
harvesting of a controlled substance;
(23) Immediate precursor means a substance which is the principal
compound commonly used or produced primarily for use and which is an
immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the
manufacture of a controlled substance, the control of which is necessary
to prevent, curtail, or limit such manufacture;
(24) State means the State of Nebraska;
-11-

LB316 LB316
2025 2025
(25) Ultimate user means a person who lawfully possesses a
controlled substance for his or her own use, for the use of a member of
his or her household, or for administration to an animal owned by him or
her or by a member of his or her household;
(26) Hospital has the same meaning as in section 71-419;
(27) Cooperating individual means any person, other than a
commissioned law enforcement officer, who acts on behalf of, at the
request of, or as agent for a law enforcement agency for the purpose of
gathering or obtaining evidence of offenses punishable under the Uniform
Controlled Substances Act;
(28) Cannabidiol product has the same meaning as in section 2-503;
(29)(a) (28)(a) Hashish or concentrated cannabis means (i) the
separated resin, whether crude or purified, obtained from a plant of the
genus cannabis or (ii) any material, preparation, mixture, compound, or
other substance which contains ten percent or more by weight of
tetrahydrocannabinols.
(b) When resins extracted from hemp as defined in section 2-503 are
in the possession of a person as authorized under the Nebraska Hemp
Farming Act, they are not considered hashish or concentrated cannabis for
purposes of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act.
(c) Hashish or concentrated cannabis does not include any
cannabidiol product or cannabidiol contained in a drug product approved
by the federal Food and Drug Administration;
(30) (29) Exceptionally hazardous drug means (a) a narcotic drug,
(b) thiophene analog of phencyclidine, (c) phencyclidine, (d)
amobarbital, (e) secobarbital, (f) pentobarbital, (g) amphetamine, or (h)
methamphetamine;
(31) (30) Imitation controlled substance means a substance which is
not a controlled substance or controlled substance analogue but which, by
way of express or implied representations and consideration of other
relevant factors including those specified in section 28-445, would lead
-12-

LB316 LB316
2025 2025
a reasonable person to believe the substance is a controlled substance or
controlled substance analogue. A placebo or registered investigational
drug manufactured, distributed, possessed, or delivered in the ordinary
course of practice or research by a health care professional shall not be
deemed to be an imitation controlled substance;
(32)(a) (31)(a) Controlled substance analogue means a substance (i)
the chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical
structure of a Schedule I or Schedule II controlled substance as provided
in section 28-405 or (ii) which has a stimulant, depressant, analgesic,
or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system that is
substantially similar to or greater than the stimulant, depressant,
analgesic, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a
Schedule I or Schedule II controlled substance as provided in section
28-405. A controlled substance analogue shall, to the extent intended for
human consumption, be treated as a controlled substance under Schedule I
of section 28-405 for purposes of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act;
and
(b) Controlled substance analogue does not include (i) a controlled
substance, (ii) any substance generally recognized as safe and effective
within the meaning of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C.
301 et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2014, (iii) any substance
for which there is an approved new drug application, or (iv) with respect
to a particular person, any substance if an exemption is in effect for
investigational use for that person, under section 505 of the Federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. 355, as such section existed on
January 1, 2014, to the extent conduct with respect to such substance is
pursuant to such exemption;
(33) (32) Anabolic steroid means any drug or hormonal substance,
chemically and pharmacologically related to testosterone (other than
estrogens, progestins, and corticosteroids), that promotes muscle growth
and includes any controlled substance in Schedule III(d) of section
-13-

LB316 LB316
2025 2025
28-405. Anabolic steroid does not include any anabolic steroid which is
expressly intended for administration through implants to cattle or other
nonhuman species and has been approved by the Secretary of Health and
Human Services for such administration, but if any person prescribes,
dispenses, or distributes such a steroid for human use, such person shall
be considered to have prescribed, dispensed, or distributed an anabolic
steroid within the meaning of this subdivision;
(34) (33) Chart order means an order for a controlled substance
issued by a practitioner for a patient who is in the hospital where the
chart is stored or for a patient receiving detoxification treatment or
maintenance treatment pursuant to section 28-412. Chart order does not
include a prescription;
(35) (34) Medical order means a prescription, a chart order, or an
order for pharmaceutical care issued by a practitioner;
(36) (35) Prescription means an order for a controlled substance
issued by a practitioner. Prescription does not include a chart order;
(37) (36) Registrant means any person who has a controlled
substances registration issued by the state or the Drug Enforcement
Administration of the United States Department of Justice;
(38) (37) Reverse distributor means a person whose primary function
is to act as an agent for a pharmacy, wholesaler, manufacturer, or other
entity by receiving, inventorying, and managing the disposition of
outdated, expired, or otherwise nonsaleable controlled substances;
(39) (38) Signature means the name, word, or mark of a person
written in his or her own hand with the intent to authenticate a writing
or other form of communication or a digital signature which complies with
section 86-611 or an electronic signature;
(40) (39) Facsimile means a copy generated by a system that encodes
a document or photograph into electrical signals, transmits those signals
over telecommunications lines, and reconstructs the signals to create an
exact duplicate of the original document at the receiving end;
-14-

LB316 LB316
2025 2025
(41) (40) Electronic signature has the definition found in section
86-621;
(42) (41) Electronic transmission means transmission of information
in electronic form. Electronic transmission includes computer-to-computer
transmission or computer-to-facsimile transmission;
(43) (42) Long-term care facility means an intermediate care
facility, an intermediate care facility for persons with developmental
disabilities, a long-term care hospital, a mental health substance use
treatment center, a nursing facility, or a skilled nursing facility, as
such terms are defined in the Health Care Facility Licensure Act;
(44) (43) Compounding has the same meaning as in section 38-2811;
(45) (44) Cannabinoid receptor agonist means any chemical compound
or substance that, according to scientific or medical research, study,
testing, or analysis, demonstrates the presence of binding activity at
one or more of the CB1 or CB2 cell membrane receptors located within the
human body. Cannabinoid receptor agonist does not include any cannabidiol
product or cannabidiol contained in a drug product approved by the
federal Food and Drug Administration; and
(46) (45) Lookalike substance means a product or substance, not
specifically designated as a controlled substance in section 28-405, that
is either portrayed in such a manner by a person to lead another person
to reasonably believe that it produces effects on the human body that
replicate, mimic, or are intended to simulate the effects produced by a
controlled substance or that possesses one or more of the following
indicia or characteristics:
(a) The packaging or labeling of the product or substance suggests
that the user will achieve euphoria, hallucination, mood enhancement,
stimulation, or another effect on the human body that replicates or
mimics those produced by a controlled substance;
(b) The name or packaging of the product or substance uses images or
labels suggesting that it is a controlled substance or produces effects
-15-

LB316 LB316
2025 2025
on the human body that replicate or mimic those produced by a controlled
substance;
(c) The product or substance is marketed or advertised for a
particular use or purpose and the cost of the product or substance is
disproportionately higher than other products or substances marketed or
advertised for the same or similar use or purpose;
(d) The packaging or label on the product or substance contains
words or markings that state or suggest that the product or substance is
in compliance with state and federal laws regulating controlled
substances;
(e) The owner or person in control of the product or substance uses
evasive tactics or actions to avoid detection or inspection of the
product or substance by law enforcement authorities;
(f) The owner or person in control of the product or substance makes
a verbal or written statement suggesting or implying that the product or
substance is a synthetic drug or that consumption of the product or
substance will replicate or mimic effects on the human body to those
effects commonly produced through use or consumption of a controlled
substance;
(g) The owner or person in control of the product or substance makes
a verbal or written statement to a prospective customer, buyer, or
recipient of the product or substance implying that the product or
substance may be resold for profit; or
(h) The product or substance contains a chemical or chemical
compound that does not have a legitimate relationship to the use or
purpose claimed by the seller, distributor, packer, or manufacturer of
the product or substance or indicated by the product name, appearing on
the product's packaging or label or depicted in advertisement of the
product or substance.
Sec. 7. Original sections 2-501, 2-503, 2-505, 2-515, and 28-401,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-16-